Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4927.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [325F.701] PROHIBITION ON ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE PERFORMING LICENSED ACTIVITIES. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Artificial intelligence model" means a machine-based system that is capable of, for explicit or implicit objectives, inferring from the input the system receives how to generate outputs that are capable of influencing physical or virtual environments. new text end new text begin (c) "Consumer" means a natural person or business that is not a credentialed professional for professional services that the natural person or business is seeking. new text end new text begin (d) "Credentialed" means a natural person or a business that holds a current license, certificate, or registration to provide professional services. new text end new text begin (e) "Professional services" means services for which the state requires a license, certificate, or registration. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Prohibition on artificial intelligence models performing professional services. new text end new text begin (a) The owner of an artificial intelligence model is prohibited from allowing the model to provide a professional service to a consumer unless the model is operated, while the service is being provided, by a natural person who is credentialed to provide the professional services or by a natural person representing a business that is credentialed to provide the professional services. new text end new text begin (b) A business or a person is prohibited from using an artificial intelligence model to provide a professional service to a consumer unless the model is operated, while the service is being provided, by a natural person who is credentialed to provide the professional services or by a natural person representing a business that is credentialed to provide the professional services. new text end new text begin (c) This section does not prohibit a credentialed professional from using an artificial intelligence model as a tool to assist the credentialed professional in performing a professional service. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Enforcement and penalties; attorney general. new text end new text begin A violation of this section is subject to enforcement by the attorney general under section 8.31. new text end